District of Columbia statutes.
38-1207.04

Report on grant program participation.

At the termination of each semester, the Trustees of the University shall furnish to the Council of the District of Columbia a statement of:

(1)

The number of persons who, during that semester, received tuition grants and participated in one or more courses pursuant to the provisions of this subchapter;

(2)

The total number of course enrollments attributable to these persons;

(3)

The number of individuals included in the response to paragraph (1) of this section who successfully completed each course, who dropped out, or who otherwise did not complete a course in which the individual had enrolled; and

(4)

The total amount of funds granted for the semester pursuant to this program to offset charges for tuition and required fees.

Oct. 26, 1974, Pub. L. 93-471, title VII, § 704
as added Feb. 18, 1988, D.C. Law 7-74, § 2, 34 DCR 7946
1981 Ed., § 31-1574.